Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2503
Corporation dissolution; change of name; effect; continued use of name; not required.

Any corporation may be dissolved or may change its name from the name registered in accordance with the Name Protection Act, and such dissolution or change of name shall not be deemed an abandonment of any name registered pursuant to such act. Continued use of a registered name shall not be a prerequisite to protection of a registered name under such act.

Laws 1986, LB 1025, § 3.